Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0295.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1170c. (1) By not later than December 31, 2025, the department, in consultation with water safety experts, shall develop or adopt, and make available to school districts and public school academies, a model program of instruction on water safety. The model program of instruction on water safety must include, at a minimum, all of the following topics, as appropriate: (a) The proper use of flotation devices. (b) Awareness of water conditions. (c) The proper supervision of swim areas. (d) Safe behaviors in and around the water. (e) The importance of pool barriers and fencing. (f) The importance of water safety and swim skills training. (g) The importance of avoiding alcohol and substance use with water recreation. (h) The importance of cardiopulmonary resuscitation for drowning victims and the importance of administering cardiopulmonary resuscitation. (2) The department, in consultation with water safety experts, shall review the model program of instruction on water safety under subsection (1) at least once every year and shall update and revise the model program of instruction on water safety as needed. (3) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, the board of a school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall ensure that each student who is enrolled in the school district or public school academy receives age- and grade-appropriate instruction on water safety that includes, at a minimum, the topics described in subsection (1). The water safety instruction must be provided as part of a physical education course. Each school district and public school academy may customize the instruction on water safety based on geographic characteristics and other special circumstances applicable to the school district or public school academy. (4) By not later than July 1, 2026, the department of health and human services shall develop, and provide to the department, an informational notice in English, Spanish, and Arabic containing information and best practices regarding water safety. (5) The department shall share the informational notice developed under subsection (4) with all public and nonpublic schools. (6) Beginning July 1, 2026, the department of health and human services shall update annually the informational notice developed under subsection (4) to account for any change in water safety best practices. The updated notice must be provided annually to the department by not later than July 1. (7) Beginning October 1, 2026, and every October 1 thereafter, the board of a school district or intermediate school district, the board of directors of a public school academy, or the governing body of a nonpublic school shall distribute the informational notice developed under subsection (4) to the parent or legal guardian of each student enrolled in the school district, intermediate school district, public school academy, or nonpublic school. The informational notice may be distributed electronically or by mail. (8) By not later than October 1, 2026, the department shall post the English, Spanish, and Arabic versions of the informational notice developed under subsection (4) on the department's website. (9) By not later than October 1, 2026, the board of a school district or intermediate school district, the board of directors of a public school academy, or the governing body of a nonpublic school shall post links to the department webpages described in subsection (8) on the website of the school district, public school academy, or nonpublic school. (10) The department, the department of health and human services, a school district, an intermediate school district, a public school academy, a nonpublic school, and any officers, board members, or employees of those institutions are immune from civil liability, both personally and professionally, for any damages allegedly caused by, arising out of, or relating to the informational notice developed under subsection (4).